Massachusetts, session 194th, S1542.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 112 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by striking out section 13 and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 13. (a) As used in this chapter, "podiatry" shall mean the diagnosis and treatment,
by medical, mechanical, electrical or surgical means, of ailments of the human foot and lower
leg.
(b) As used in sections 12B, 12G and 80B, "physician" shall include a podiatrist
registered under section 16.
(c) Sections 13 to 18, inclusive, shall not apply to surgeons of the United States army,
United States navy or of the United States Public Health Service or to physicians registered in
the commonwealth.
of 1